Hawaii, session 2025, SB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Huli Au Ola, Maui county area health education center, provides support and assistance to underserved and rural areas of Maui county. The island of Molokai is the area most underserved by non-primary care physicians and dentists.  The retention of physicians and dentists is critical to the Molokai community of approximately seven thousand residents. With only one airline serving the island of Molokai, the lack of medical professionals on Molokai is crucial.  Many Molokai residents cannot afford to travel to seek medical and dental care. Although telehealth is available for most community members, more serious conditions require an in-person visit with a medical professional. The purpose of this Act is to require Huli Au Ola to conduct a study on the recruitment and retention of physicians and dentists to be located on and serve the island of Molokai. SECTION 2. (a) The university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine shall direct Huli Au Ola to conduct a study on the recruitment and retention of physicians and dentists to serve the island of Molokai. (b) The study shall include information related to: (1)  Recruitment; (2)  Retention; (3)  Housing availability; (4)  Transportation availability; (5)  Airline availability; (6)  Partnerships; (7)  Communication; and (8)  Evaluation process. SECTION 3. Huli Au Ola shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $175,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to study the recruitment and retention of physicians and dentists to serve the island of Molokai. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________